Nebraska, session 109, LB307.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB307 LB307
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $XXX from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $XXX from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to
the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, for Program 48, for
tuition waivers.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$XXX General Funds for tuition waivers pursuant to the First Responders
Recruitment and Retention Act, the In the Line of Duty Dependent
Education Act, and sections 80-411 and 80-901, which shall only be used
for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program
for FY2026-27 $XXX General Funds for tuition waivers pursuant to the
First Responders Recruitment and Retention Act, the In the Line of Duty
Dependent Education Act, and sections 80-411 and 80-901, which shall only
be used for such purpose.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $XXX from the General Fund
for FY2025-26 and (2) $XXX from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, for Program 781, for
tuition waivers.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$XXX General Funds for tuition waivers pursuant to the First Responders
Recruitment and Retention Act, the In the Line of Duty Dependent
Education Act, and sections 80-411 and 80-901, which shall only be used
for such purpose. There is included in the appropriation to this program
for FY2026-27 $XXX General Funds for tuition waivers pursuant to the
First Responders Recruitment and Retention Act, the In the Line of Duty
Dependent Education Act, and sections 80-411 and 80-901, which shall only
be used for such purpose.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-